Louisiana, session 2026, HB34.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 11:2178(C)(3)(c) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§2178. Disability benefits; retirement benefits; death benefits
* * *
C.
* * *
(3)
* * *
(c) In the event a member whose first employment making him eligible for
membership in the system began on or after January 1, 2012, is eligible for deferred
retirement and is over fifty years of age with at least thirty years of creditable
service, the member may elect to take, in lieu of deferred retirement, the actuarial
equivalent of the benefit due had the member attained age fifty-five. The retirement
shall become effective upon receipt of the member's written application by the board
of trustees.
* * *
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 34 ENROLLED
Section 2. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.